Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB550.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5771YC (1) 91 je/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 262.9, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 43. Direct each institution of higher 3 education governed by the board to apply for accreditation by 4 the commission for public higher education and to take any 5 steps necessary to qualify for such accreditation. 6